District of Columbia statutes.
31-5051.02

License requirements; training; sale of plans.

(a)

A vendor is required to hold a limited-lines license to sell or offer coverage under a policy of portable electronics insurance.

(b)

(1)

A limited-lines license issued under this section shall authorize any employee or authorized representative of the vendor to sell or offer coverage under a policy of portable electronics insurance to a customer at each location at which the vendor engages in portable electronics transactions and such employee or authorized representative shall not be subject to licensure as an insurance producer; provided, that the insurer issuing the portable electronics insurance either directly supervises or appoints a supervising entity to supervise the administration of the training program, including development of a training program, for employees and authorized representatives of the vendors.

(2)

(A)

The training required by this subsection shall comply with the following requirements:

(i)

The training shall be provided to employees and authorized representatives of vendors who are directly engaged in the activity of selling or offering portable electronics insurance;

(ii)

The training may be provided in electronic form; provided, that, if conducted in an electronic form, the supervising entity shall implement a supplemental education program regarding the portable electronics insurance product that is conducted and overseen by licensed employees of the supervising entity; and

(iii)

Each employee and authorized representative shall receive basic instruction about the portable electronics insurance offered to customers and the disclosures required under subsection (d) of this section.

(B)

The training provided pursuant to this subsection shall not be subject to the prior approval requirement of § 31-1131.05a(b).

(c)

No employee or authorized representative of a vendor of portable electronics shall advertise, represent, or otherwise hold himself or herself out as a non-limited lines licensed insurance producer.

(d)

At every location where portable electronics insurance is offered to customers, brochures or other written materials must be made available to a prospective customer that:

(1)

Disclose that portable electronics insurance may provide a duplication of coverage already provided by a customer’s homeowner’s insurance policy, renter’s insurance policy, or other source of coverage;

(2)

State that the enrollment by the customer in a portable electronics insurance program is not required in order to purchase or lease portable electronics or services;

(3)

Summarize the material terms of the insurance coverage, including:

(A)

The identity of the insurer;

(B)

The identity of the supervising entity;

(C)

The amount of any applicable deductible and how it is to be paid;

(D)

Benefits of the coverage; and

(E)

Key terms and conditions of coverage, such as whether portable electronics may be repaired or replaced with similar make and model reconditioned or non-original manufacturer parts or equipment;

(4)

Summarize the process for filing a claim, including a description of how to return portable electronics and the maximum fee applicable in the event the customer fails to comply with any equipment return requirements; and

(5)

State that an enrolled customer may cancel enrollment for coverage under a portable electronics insurance policy at any time and the person paying the premium shall receive a refund of any applicable unearned premium.

(e)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, employees or authorized representatives of a vendor of portable electronics shall not be compensated based primarily on the number of customers enrolled for portable electronics insurance coverage but may receive compensation for activities under the limited-lines license that is incidental to their overall compensation.

(f)

The supervising entity appointed to supervise a vendor’s portable electronics insurance program shall maintain a registry of vendor locations that are authorized to sell or solicit portable electronics insurance coverage in the District. Upon request by the Commissioner and with 10 days notice to the supervising entity, the registry shall be open to inspection and examination by the Commissioner during regular business hours of the supervising entity.

(g)

Applications for licensure under this section shall be made by a vendor in accordance with § 31-1131.06 for residents of the District and § 31-1131.08 for non-residents. Information regarding a vendor’s officers, directors, or shareholders submitted in connection with a vendor’s application for licensure shall be limited to an employee or officer of the vendor that is designated by the applicant as the person responsible for the vendor’s compliance with the requirements of this section; provided, that if the vendor derives more than 50% of its revenue from the sale of portable electronics insurance, the information shall be provided for all officers, directors, and shareholders of record having beneficial ownership of 10% or more of any class of securities registered under the federal securities law.

May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-306, § 102, 60 DCR 2746